Utah statutes.
63G-2-309.   Confidentiality claims.
(1) (a) (i)  Any person who provides to a governmental entity a record that
the person believes should be protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(1) or (2)
or both Subsections 63G-2-305(1) and (2) shall provide with the record:
(A)  a written claim of business confidentiality; and
(B)  a concise statement of reasons supporting the claim of business
confidentiality.
(ii)  Any of the following who provides to an institution within the state
system of higher education defined in Section 53B-1-102 a record that the
person or governmental entity believes should be protected under Subsection
63G-2-305(40)(a)(ii) or (vi) or both Subsections 63G-2-305(40)(a)(ii) and (vi)
shall provide the institution within the state system of higher education a
written claim of business confidentiality in accordance with Section
53B-16-304:
(A)  a person;
(B)  a federal governmental entity;
(C)  a state governmental entity; or
(D)  a local governmental entity.
(b)  A person or governmental entity who complies with this Subsection (1)
shall be notified by the governmental entity to whom the request for a record
is made if:
(i)  a record claimed to be protected under one of the following is classified
public:
(A)  Subsection 63G-2-305(1);
(B)  Subsection 63G-2-305(2);
(C)  Subsection 63G-2-305(40)(a)(ii);
(D)  Subsection 63G-2-305(40)(a)(vi); or
(E)  a combination of the provisions described in Subsections (1)(b)(i)(A)
through (D); or
(ii)  the governmental entity to whom the request for a record is made
determines that the record claimed to be protected under a provision listed in
Subsection (1)(b)(i) should be released after balancing interests under
Subsection 63G-2-201(5)(b) or 63G-2-401(6).
(2)  Except as provided by court order, the governmental entity to whom the
request for a record is made may not disclose a record claimed to be protected
under a provision listed in Subsection (1)(b)(i) but which the governmental
entity or records committee determines should be disclosed until the period in
which to bring an appeal expires or the end of the appeals process, including
judicial appeal.  This Subsection (2) does not apply where the claimant, after
notice, has waived the claim by not appealing or intervening before the
records committee.
(3)  Disclosure or acquisition of information under this chapter does not
constitute misappropriation under Subsection 13-24-2(2).
